Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.030

Prevailing party to recover costs.

In any action in the superior court of Washington the prevailing party shall be entitled to his or her costs and disbursements; but the plaintiff shall in no case be entitled to costs taxed as attorneys' fees in actions within the jurisdiction of the district court when commenced in the superior court.

[ 1987 c 202 s 121; 1890 p 337 s 1; 1883 p 42 s 1; Code 1881 ss 506, 507; 1854 p 201 ss 368, 369; RRS s 476.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.